Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-Masc_Retroflex2.2.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL 
LEXICON Root
NounMascRetroflex22Stem;

LEXICON NounMascRetroflex22Stem   

අධ්‍යක්ෂවර NounMascRetroflex22;
අධිනීතිඥවර NounMascRetroflex22;
අධිපතිවර NounMascRetroflex22;
අපෝස්තුලුවර NounMascRetroflex22;
අමාත්‍යවර NounMascRetroflex22;
ආඥාපතිවර NounMascRetroflex22;
ඇමතිවර NounMascRetroflex22;
ඉන්දියන්වර NounMascRetroflex22;
කර්තෘවර NounMascRetroflex22;
කළමනාකර NounMascRetroflex22;
ක්‍රියාකර NounMascRetroflex22;
කොමියුනිස්ට්වර NounMascRetroflex22;
ග්‍රාමසේවකවර NounMascRetroflex22;
ගුරුවර NounMascRetroflex22;
තානාපතිවර NounMascRetroflex22;
තැන්පතුකරදොස්තරවර NounMascRetroflex22;
නාහිමිවර NounMascRetroflex22;
පඬිවර NounMascRetroflex22;
ප්‍රධානාචාර්යවර NounMascRetroflex22;
ප්‍රමුඛාචාර්යවර NounMascRetroflex22;
මන්ත්‍රිවර NounMascRetroflex22;
මන්ත්‍රීවර NounMascRetroflex22;
මහත්වර NounMascRetroflex22;
මහාචාර්යවර NounMascRetroflex22;
මුදලිවර NounMascRetroflex22;
රදලවර NounMascRetroflex22;
රදළවර NounMascRetroflex22;
ලුතිනන්වර NounMascRetroflex22;
ලේකම්වර NounMascRetroflex22;
විදුහල්පතිවර NounMascRetroflex22;
වෛද්‍යවර NounMascRetroflex22;
ශල්‍යවෛද්‍යවර NounMascRetroflex22;
සභාපතිවර NounMascRetroflex22;
සහකර NounMascRetroflex22;
සිටුවර NounMascRetroflex22;
සෘෂිවර NounMascRetroflex22;
හිමිවර NounMascRetroflex22;




LEXICON NounMascRetroflex22

+N+RT: #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM:ු  #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM+CJ:ුත්  #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM+FN:ුයි  #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC:ෙකු #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC:ුන්  #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC+CJ:ුනුත්  #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC+FN:ුනි  #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT:ෙකුට #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+CJ:ෙකුටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+FN:ෙකුටයි #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT:ුන්ට #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT+CJ:ුන්ටත් #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT+FN:ුන්ටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL:ෙකුගෙන් #;
N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+CJ:ෙකුගෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+FN:ෙකුගෙනි #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL:ුන්ගෙන් #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL+CJ:ුන්ගෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL+FN:ුන්ගෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:ෙකුගේ #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:ෙකුගේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:ෙකුගේයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:කුගේ #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:කුගේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:කුගේයි #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN: ුන්ගේ #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+CJ: ුන්ගේත් #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+FN: ුන්ගේයි #;
+N+RT+PL+VOC:ුනි #
